src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON MOKKE !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to ALGE
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;						! alge
+Attr: flagK ;						! alge
+Sg+Gen:^WG flagK ; 					! alge
+Sg+Acc:^WG flagK ; 					! alge
+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN^EA%>n flagK ; 	! aalgan
+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN%>st flagK ; 	! algeest
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN%>in flagK ; 		! olgijn 
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá flagK ; 		! algettáá
+Ess:%>n flagK ; 			! algen
!+Par:%>d flagK ; 			! alged
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;



!LEXICON ORDO-plc
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ORDO ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;
!
!LEXICON ORDO  !!= __@CODE@__ similar to  KIRKKO 
!+Attr: flagK ;
!+Sg+Nom: flagK ;   !kirkko
!+Sg+Gen:^WG flagK ;   !kirho
!+Sg+Acc:^WG flagK ;   !ki´rho
!+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN^EA%>n flagK ;   !kiirkon
!+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^SLEN%>st flagK ;
!+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN%>in flagK ;   !kirhoin
!+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá flagK ;   !kirhottáá
!+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
!


!LEXICON KREIKKA-ani
!+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: KREIKKA ;
!
!LEXICON KREIKKA-plc
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: KREIKKA ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;
!
!LEXICON KREIKKA-fem !!= * __@CODE@__ Ella
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: KREIKKA ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> BEL ;
!
!LEXICON KREIKKA-mal !!= * __@CODE@__ Mikko
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: KREIKKA ;
!!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> BEL ;
!
!
!LEXICON KREIKKA
!+Attr: flagK ;
! @U.Cap.Obl@ X_KISSA_SG ;
!+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
!+Cmp/SgGen:^WG RProp ; 
! :^WG PERSNAME-GENCMPflag ;
!  PERSNAME-NOMCMPflag ;
!

!LEXICON UAIVAS-mal   * __@CODE@__ similar to KUAVDAS.
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: UAIVAS ;
!
!
!LEXICON UAIVAS-fem   * __@CODE@__ similar to KUAVDAS.
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: UAIVAS ;


LEXICON UAIVAS-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to KUAVDAS. 
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: UAIVAS ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON UAIVAS !!= * __@CODE@__   similar to KUAVDAS
+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:â^WG^RLEN%>š flagK ; 		! kuávdâš piäivâš
+Attr+Err/Orth:â^WG^RLEN%>š flagK ; 		! kuávdâš piäivâš
+Sg+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>š flagK ; 		! kuávdáš piäiváš
+Attr:^WG^RLEN%>š flagK ; 		! kuávdáš piäiváš
+Sg+Gen:^SV^SLEN flagK ; 			! kuávdáá piäiváá
+Sg+Acc:^SV^SLEN flagK ;			! kuávdáá piäiváá
+Sg+Ill:^WG^RVSH%>žân flagK ;	! kuávdážân piäiváážân
+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:^WG^RLEN%>žân flagK ;		!  kuávdážân piäivážân
+Sg+Loc:^SV^SLEN%>st flagK ;			! kuávdáást
+Sg+Com:%>in flagK ; 			! kuávdáin
+Sg+Abe:^SV^SLEN%>ttáá flagK ; 		! kuávdááttáá
+Ess:^WG^RVSH%>žin flagK ;		! kuávdážin
+Ess+Use/NG:^WG^RLEN%>žin flagK ;			! kuávdáážin
!+Par:^WG^RLEN%>žid flagK ; 			! kuávdáážid
!+Par+Use/NG:^WG^RVSH%>žid flagK ;		! kuávdážid
+Cmp/SgNom:â^WG^RLEN%>š RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^SV^SLEN%> RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^SV^SLEN%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON SUALUI-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to PUASUI and KUAVSUI. 
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: SUALUI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON SUALUI  !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to PUASUI and KUAVSUI
+Ess:%>n flagK ;     ! poccun
!+Par:%>d flagK ;     ! poccud
+Sg+Nom:i4^WG flagK ;   	! kuávsui
+Attr:i4^WG flagK ;   	! kuávsui
+Sg+Gen:^SV^SLEN flagK ;  			 		! kuoksuu
+Sg+Acc:^SV^SLEN flagK ;   					! kuoksuu
+Sg+Ill:%>i   flagK ;       		! kuoksui
+Sg+Loc:%>st flagK ;        		! kuoksust
+Sg+Com:%>in K; 				! kuoksuin
+Sg+Abe:^SV^SLEN%>ttáá flagK ;  		   		! kuoksuuttáá
+Ess:j^WG^RVSH%>in flagK ;     ! kuávsujin
!+Par:j^WG^RVSH%>id flagK ;     ! kuávsujid
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 


LEXICON SUOLLUUH-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ SUALUI-plc plurals 
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: SUOLLUUH ;


LEXICON SUOLLUUH  !!= * __@CODE@__ SUALUI-plc plurals 
+Pl+Nom:^SV^SLEN%>h flagK ;       	  		! kuoksuuh
+Pl+Gen:%>i flagK ;        		! kuoksui
+Pl+Acc:%>id flagK ;        		! kuoksuid
+Pl+Ill:%>id flagK ;        		! kuoksuid 
+Pl+Loc:%>in flagK ;        		! kuoksuin
+Pl+Com:%>iguin flagK ;     		! kuoksuiguin
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>igijn flagK ;     		! kuoksuiguin
+Pl+Abe:%>ittáá flagK ;    		! kuoksuittáá
+Cmp/PlNom:^SV^SLEN%>h RProp ; 


LEXICON ROTO-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to LAJO and X_LAJO 
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ROTO ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON ROTO  !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to LAJO and X_LAJO
+Attr: flagK ;
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;  !laj̣o
+Sg+Gen:^WG flagK ;  !lajo
+Sg+Acc:^WG flagK ;  !lajo
+Sg+Ill:%>n    flagK ;   !laj̣on
+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN%>st flagK ;  !laajoost
+Sg+Com:^WG%>in flagK ;  !lajoin
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá flagK ;  !lajottáá
+Ess:^SV^CLEN^SLEN%>n    flagK ;  !laijoon
!+Par:^SV^CLEN^SLEN%>d    flagK ; !laijood
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON KURRA-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to SOLLA
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: KURRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON KURRA  !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to SOLLA
+Attr: flagK ;
+Sg+Nom: K;				 		! sollâ
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN flagK ;     		! soolâ
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN flagK ;     		! soolâ
+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN%>n flagK ;		! soolân
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st flagK ; 		! soolâst
+Sg+Com:^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>in flagK ; ! sooláin
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá flagK ;		! solâttáá
+Ess:^CLEN%>n flagK ;				! sollân
!+Par:^CLEN%>d flagK ;				! sollâd
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgNom:%> RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON LASSA-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to FADDA
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LASSA ;


LEXICON LASSA  !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to FADDA
+Attr: flagK ;
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;               ! kissá
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN flagK ;     ! fáádá, ráávsá
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN flagK ;     ! fáádá, ráávsá
+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN%>n flagK ;      ! kiisán CSH?
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st flagK ; ! fáádást, ráávsást
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN%>in flagK ; ! kissáin, rávssáin, fáddáin DIFFERS FROM KUTKA
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá flagK ;     ! kisáttáá 
+Ess:%>n flagK ;               ! kissán
!+Par:%>d flagK ;               ! kissád
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgNom:^WG^RLEN%> RProp ;  !????


!LEXICON SUANJU-mal   * __@CODE@__ similar to LAAVU
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: SUANJU ;

LEXICON SUANJU-ani !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to LAAVU
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: SUANJU ;


LEXICON SUANJU-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to LAAVU
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: SUANJU ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON SUANJU !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to LAAVU
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;               ! láávu
+Attr: flagK ;               ! láávu
+Sg+Gen:^WG flagK ;     ! láávu
+Sg+Acc:^WG flagK ;     ! láávu
+Sg+Ill:%>n flagK ;      ! láávun
+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st flagK ; ! láávust
+Sg+Com:^WG^SVLOW%>in flagK ; ! láávoin
+Sg+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ttáá flagK ;     ! lávuttáá 
+Ess:^CLEN%>n flagK ;               ! láávvun
!+Par:^CLEN%>d flagK ;               ! láávvud 
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON NYERI-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to KYELI
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NYERI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON NYERI  !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to KYELI
+Attr: flagK ;
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;                 ! kyeli
+Sg+Gen:e^WG^RVSH flagK ;         ! kyele
+Sg+Acc:e^WG^RVSH flagK ;         ! kyele
+Sg+Ill:^EA^CSH^RLEN%>n flagK ;     ! kuálán
+Sg+Loc:e^WG%>est flagK ;   ! kyeleest
!+Sg+Com:^WG%>in flagK ;         ! kuolijn
!+Sg+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ttáá flagK ;  ! kyelettáá
!+Ess:^CLEN%>n flagK ;     ! kyellin
!+Par:^CLEN%>d flagK ; 					! kyellid
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RVSH%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


!LEXICON POHE-fem !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to VAHE
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: POHE ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> BEL ;

LEXICON POHE-ani !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to VAHE
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: POHE ;


LEXICON POHE-mal !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to VAHE
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: POHE ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> BEL ;


LEXICON POHE-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to VAHE
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: POHE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON POHE !!= * __@CODE@__ nearly similar to VAHE
+Sg+Nom: flagK ; 						! vahe
+Attr: flagK ; 						! vahe
+Sg+Gen:^WG flagK ;					! vave
+Sg+Acc:^WG flagK ;					! vave
+Sg+Ill:^EA%>n flagK ; 				! vahan
+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN%>st flagK ; 	! pooveest
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN%>in flagK ; 		! vovvijn
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá flagK ; 			! vavettáá
+Ess:^SV^CLEN^SLEN%>n flagK ; 			! vahheen
!+Par:^SV^CLEN^SLEN%>d flagK ; 		! vahheed
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON EENA-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to EENNAM, except for sg nom, eenâ (a rare form)
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: EENNAM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;



LEXICON EENNAM-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to EEMEED
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: EENNAM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON EENNAM-mal !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to EEMEED
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: EENNAM ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;


LEXICON EENNAM  !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to EEMEED
+Attr: flagK ;
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;					! eemeed
+Sg+Gen: flagK ;					! eemeed
+Sg+Acc: flagK ;					! eemeed
+Sg+Ill:^CSH^SVSH%>ân flagK ;	! emedân
+Sg+Loc:^CSH^SVSH%>ist flagK ;	! emedist
+Sg+Com:^CSH^SVSH%>áin flagK ;	! emedáin
+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá flagK ;		! eemeedttáá
+Ess:^CSH^SVSH%>in flagK ;		! emedin
!+Par:^CSH^SVSH%>id flagK ;		! emedid
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 


LEXICON ENAMEH-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to EEMEED
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ENAMEH ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON ENAMEH  !!= * __@CODE@__  plurals for EEMEED
+Pl+Nom:^CSH^SVSH%>eh flagK ;		! emedeh
+Pl+Gen:^CSH^SVSH%>ij flagK ;		! emedij
+Pl+Acc:^CSH^SVSH%>ijd flagK ;	! emedijd
+Pl+Ill:^CSH^SVSH%>áid flagK ;	! emedáid
+Pl+Loc:^CSH^SVSH%>ijn flagK ;	! emedijn
+Pl+Com:^CSH^SVSH%>ijguin flagK ;	! emedijguin
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:^CSH^SVSH%>ijgijn flagK ;	! emedijguin
+Pl+Abe:^CSH^SVSH%>ijttáá flagK ;	! emedijttáá
+Cmp/PlNom:^CSH^SVSH%>eh RProp ; 


LEXICON CUAJA-fem !!= * __@CODE@__ XXX check this
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: CUAJA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RVSH^SVLOW%> BEL ;

LEXICON CUAJA-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to TAALU2
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: CUAJA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON CUAJA !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to TAALU2
+Attr: flagK ;
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;               ! vuáṛu
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RVSH^SVLOW flagK ;    ! vuáro
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RVSH^SVLOW flagK ;           ! vuáro
+Sg+Ill:%>n flagK ;      ! vuáṛun
+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^RVSH^SLEN^SVLOW%>st flagK ; ! vuároost
+Sg+Com:^WG^RVSH^SVLOW%>in flagK ; ! vuároin
+Sg+Abe:^WG^RVSH^SVLOW%>ttáá flagK ;     ! vuárottáá
+Ess:^CLEN%>n flagK ;               ! vuárrun
!+Par:^CLEN%>d flagK ;               ! vuárrud
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RVSH^SVLOW%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


!LEXICON HIATTA-plc
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: HIATTA ;

!LEXICON HIATTA !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to 2KISSA
!+Sg+Nom: flagK ;               ! kissá
!+Sg+Gen:^WG flagK ;           ! kiṣá
!+Sg+Acc:^WG flagK ;           ! kiṣá
!+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN%>n flagK ;      ! kiiṣán
!+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN%>st flagK ; ! kissáást
!+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN%>in flagK ; ! kissáin
!+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá flagK ;     ! kiṣáttáá 
!+Ess:^CLEN%>n flagK ;         ! kissán
!+Par:^CLEN%>d flagK ;         ! kissád
!+Cmp/SgNom: R ;
!+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> R ;


LEXICON KUOLBA-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to POOVSA
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: KUOLBA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON KUOLBA !!= * __@CODE@__  similar to POOVSA
+Attr:^FCD^WG^RLEN flagK ;			! poovsâ
+Sg+Nom:^FCD^WG^RLEN flagK ;			! poovsâ
+Sg+Gen: flagK ;				! poksâm
+Sg+Acc: flagK ;				! poksâm
+Sg+Ill:%>ân flagK ;			! poksâmân
+Sg+Loc:%>ist flagK ;			! poksâmist
+Sg+Com:%>áin flagK ; 		! poksâmáin
+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá flagK ; 		! poksâmttáá
+Ess:^FCD^WG^RLEN%>n flagK ;			! poovsân
!+Par:^FCD^WG^RLEN%>d flagK ;			! poovsâd
+Cmp/SgNom:^FCD^WG^RLEN RProp ; 
PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON KAAVA-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to KIELA
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: KAAVA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON KAAVA !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to KIELA 
+Sg+Com:^WG^SVLOW%>in flagK ; 		! kieláin
+Ess:^CLEN%>n flagK ;				! kiellân # puolipitkä > pitkä
!+Par:^CLEN%>d flagK ;				! kiellâd # puolipitkä > pitkä
+Attr: flagK ;
+Sg+Nom: K;				 		! kiehâ
+Sg+Gen:^WG flagK ;     				! kievâ
+Sg+Acc:^WG flagK ;     				! kievâ
+Sg+Ill:%>n flagK ;					! kiehân
+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st flagK ; 				! kievâst
+Sg+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ttáá flagK ;		! kievâttáá
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;

LEXICON NJOBZA-ani !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to 2ALGA
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: NJOBZA ;
